Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3512
Meetings; notice; minutes.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1411, the clerk or administrator of each community improvement district shall notify the city or village where such district is located of all meetings of the community improvement district board of trustees or called by the administrator by sending a notice of such meeting to the clerk of the city or village not less than seven days prior to the date set for any meeting. In the case of meetings called by the administrator, notice shall be provided to the clerk of the community improvement district not less than seven days prior to the date set for any meeting.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1411, within the timeframe required by subsection (3) of section 84-1413, after any meeting of a community improvement district board of trustees or called by the administrator, the clerk or administrator of the community improvement district shall transmit to the city or village where the community improvement district is located a copy of the minutes of such meeting.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 12.
April 17, 2026